South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S703.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 5 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 5-3-105. A municipality may require by ordinance that it will not initiate an annexation procedure unless it has the agreement and approval of the county governing body where the property to be annexed is located. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----